Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4031.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. This act may be cited as the "female athletics integrity of records (FAIR) act". Sec. 2. As used in this act: (a) "Biological sex" means the state of being female or the state of being male, as an innate, objective biological condition determined at the conception of the human being. (b) "Sporting event" means an athletic event to which all of the following apply: (i) Individuals compete individually. (ii) There are separate competitions for females and males. (iii) The event is in whole or in part publicly funded. Sec. 3. Though an individual in a sporting event participates in the competition designated for members of the opposite biological sex, official awards, rankings, and records of results shall nonetheless be categorized consistent with each competitor's biological sex.